Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-144
Credential; failure to pay fees; failure to meet continuing competency requirement; effect.

(1) The credential of any person who fails, by the expiration date of such credential, to pay the required renewal fee or to submit documentation of continuing competency shall automatically expire without further notice or hearing.

(2) The department shall refuse to renew after notice and opportunity for hearing, the credential of any person who fails, by the expiration date of such credential, to meet the applicable continuing competency requirement for renewal.

(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply when the credential holder has given notification to the department that he or she desires to have his or her credential expire or be placed on inactive status upon expiration.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 48, p. 467;

C.S.1929, § 71-603;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 12, p. 543;

R.S.1943, § 71-149;

Laws 1976, LB 877, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 19;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 47;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 39;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 17;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 18;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 28;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-149;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 44.